src/morphology/incoming/dgr-orthfix.xfscript
define apostrophe1Rule [ ' -> [ ’ | ʼ | ' ] ] ;

define idotRule [ ı -> i ] ;

define agraveRule [ a ̀ -> à ] ;
define egraveRule [ e ̀ -> è ] ;
define igraveRule [ ı ̀ -> [ ì | i ̀ ] ] ;
define ograveRule [ o ̀ -> ò ] ;

define aogonekRule [ a ̨ -> ą ] ;
define eogonekRule [ e ̨ -> ę ] ;
define iogonekRule [ ı ̨ -> į ] ;
define oogonekRule [ o ̨ -> ǫ ] ;

define aogonekgraveRule [ a ̨ ̀ -> [ a ̀ ̨ | ą ̀ | à ̨ ] ] ;
define eogonekgraveRule [ e ̨ ̀ -> [ e ̀ ̨ | ę ̀ | è ̨ ] ] ;
define iogonekgraveRule [ ı ̨ ̀ -> [ i ̀ ̨ | ı ̀ ̨ | į ̀ | ì ̨ ] ] ;
define oogonekgraveRule [ o ̨ ̀ -> [ o ̀ ̨ | ǫ ̀ | ò ̨ ] ] ;


read regex [

!	apostrophe1Rule .o.		
	
	idotRule 
	
!	agraveRule .o.
!	egraveRule .o.
!	igraveRule .o.
!	ograveRule .o.
	
!	aogonekRule .o.
!	eogonekRule .o.
!	iogonekRule .o.
!	oogonekRule .o.
	
!	aogonekgraveRule .o.
!	eogonekgraveRule .o.
!	iogonekgraveRule .o.
!	oogonekgraveRule 
	
				
] ;
